Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1539
Unfair claims settlement practice; conduct prohibited.

It shall be an unfair claims settlement practice for any domestic, foreign, or alien insurer transacting business in this state to commit an act or practice defined in section 44-1540 if the act or practice (1) is committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the act or (2) has been committed with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in that type of conduct.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 21.